nursery/apertium-ro-it/dix/consistent-bilBC.dix
  <e>       <p><l><b/>veintiocho</l><r>ventotto</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>veintiséis</l><r>ventisei</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>veintisiete</l><r>ventisette</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>veintitrés</l><r>ventitr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré(2)"/></e>
 <!--   <e><p><l><b/>veintiuno</l><r>ventuno</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>    -->

  <e>       <p><l><b/>cuatro</l><r>quattro</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>diecinueve</l><r>diciannove</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>dieciocho</l><r>diciotto</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>diecisiete</l><r>diciassette</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>dieciséis</l><r>sedici</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>diez</l>  <r>dieci</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>dos</l>   <r>due</r></p><par n="mil(2)"/></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="doscientos_cincuenta_y_uno">


  <e>       <p><l><b/>noventa<b/>y<b/>uno</l><r>novantuno</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>ochenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l><r>ottantuno</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>setenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l><r>settantuno</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>sesenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l><r>sessantuno</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>cincuenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l><r>cinquantuno</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>cuarenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l><r>quarantuno</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>treinta<b/>y<b/>uno</l><r>trentuno</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>veintiuno</l><r>ventuno</r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="doscientos_mil">
      
  <e r="LR"><par n="doscientos/__num"/><p><l><s n="num"/><s n="f"/></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><par n="doscientos/__num"/><p><l><s n="num"/><s n="m"/></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><par n="doscientos/__num"/><p><l><s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>uno<s n="num"/></l><r>uno<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <par n="doscientos_cincuenta_y_uno"/><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="ciento_mil">
      
  <e>       <par n="ciento/__num"/><p><l><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
    <!--  <e r="RL"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>      -->
  <e>       <p><l><b/>uno<s n="num"/></l><r>uno<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <par n="doscientos_cincuenta_y_uno"/><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>

</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e>       <p><l>ciento</l>                             <r>cento</r></p><par n="ciento_mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>doscientos</l>                         <r>duecento</r></p><par n="doscientos_mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>trescientos</l>                        <r>trecento</r></p><par n="doscientos_mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cuatrocientos</l>                      <r>quattrocento</r></p><par n="doscientos_mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>quinientos</l>                         <r>cinquecento</r></p><par n="doscientos_mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>setecientos</l>                        <r>settecento</r></p><par n="doscientos_mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>seiscientos</l>                        <r>seicento</r></p><par n="doscientos_mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ochocientos</l>                        <r>ottocento</r></p><par n="doscientos_mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>novecientos</l>                        <r>novecento</r></p><par n="doscientos_mil"/></e>
